Arkansas statutes. Title 12 Law Enforcement, Emergency Management, and Military Affairs
Chapter 86

Emergency Preparedness

Subchapter 1

— General Provisions

12-86-201. Title.

This subchapter shall be known and may be cited as the “Emergency Preparedness for Child Care Facilities Act”.

History.

Acts 2007, No. 816, § 1.

12-86-202. Legislative intent.

The General Assembly finds that:

Early care and education facilities at which children from birth to four (4) years of age and school-age children may spend part or all of their days may not be known to emergency preparedness agencies and thus may be overlooked in first response activities and in recovery planning following major disasters;

The health and social-emotional, cognitive, and physical development of young children may be compromised by severe traumatic experiences;

Teachers and caregivers of young children will improve the children's health and well being by being prepared for orderly evacuations and rapid reunification of young children with their parents during emergencies;

Child care facilities are crucial to the economic redevelopment of communities following major disasters; and

State child care and emergency management agencies should take steps to share data and coordinate planning, response, and recovery of child care facilities during and after major disasters.

History.

Acts 2007, No. 816, § 2.

12-86-203. Division of Child Care and Early Childhood Education policies.

The Director of the Division of Child Care and Early Childhood Education of the Department of Human Services shall coordinate efforts with other state agencies and appropriate organizations to:

Share with the Arkansas Department of Emergency Management on a quarterly basis an integrated list of all licensed child care facilities and all known license-exempt child care facilities, including without limitation physical addresses, maximum capacity, emergency contact information, and hours of operation.

The integrated list is to be sorted by county;

Include early childhood emergency preparedness courses and workshops that address specific risk factors and evacuation procedures in particular geographic areas among approved courses and workshops for meeting requirements for in-service training for licensed child care providers in those geographic areas;

Incorporate specific indicators of emergency preparedness linked to specific disaster risk factors in licensed child care providers' geographic areas into each level of any quality ratings above minimum licensing standards; and

Require a child care facility to have a written plan for evacuation in the event of fire, natural disaster, or other threatening situation that may pose a health or safety hazard to the children in the child care facility.

Require the plan to include without limitation:

A designated relocation site and evacuation route;

Procedures for notifying parents of the relocation and ensuring family reunification;

Procedures to address the needs of individual children, including children with special needs;

Instructions relating to the training of staff or the reassignment of staff duties, as appropriate;

Coordination with local emergency management officials; and

A program to ensure that appropriate staff are familiar with the plan's components.

A.C.R.C. Notes. Pursuant to §1-2-207(b) and Acts 2009, No. 165, § 62, the amendments to former subdivisions (2)-(4) of this section by Acts 2009, No. 165, § 60, are superseded by the amendments to those subdivisions by Acts 2009, No. 801, § 1.

Amendments. The 2009 amendment by No. 165 inserted “designated emergency” near the end of (2) and (3) and in (4); inserted “licensed child care” near the end of (4) and in (6); in (2), inserted “child-care” following ”license-exempt” and “emergency” following “three (3) designated”; and substituted “Arkansas Department of Emergency Management” for “state emergency management agency” in (3).

The 2009 amendment by No. 801 deleted “and status as tuition subsidy, meal subsidy, state-fund pre-kindergarten, and quality-rated facilities” at the end of (1)(A); deleted (2) through (4) and redesignated the remaining subdivision; added present (4); and made related changes.

History.

Acts 2007, No. 816, § 3; 2009, No. 165, § 60; 2009, No. 801, § 1.

12-86-204. Division of Emergency Management policies.

The Director of the Division of Emergency Management shall coordinate efforts with other state agencies and appropriate organizations to:

Disseminate county-level lists of all licensed childcare facilities and all known license-exempt childcare facilities, including without limitation physical address, maximum capacity, hours of operation, and emergency contact information, to county governments for use in search and rescue during emergencies and disasters;

Share a periodically updated statewide list of designated emergency shelters, both local shelters and mass evacuation shelters, with the Division of Child Care and Early Childhood Education, state child care subsidy program, and state child and adult nutrition program when the list is available; and

Include all licensed childcare facilities and all known license-exempt childcare facilities where critical facilities such as schools, hospitals, and nursing homes are mentioned in the state response plan, emergency preparedness exercises, or other guiding documents and activities.

Amendments. The 2009 amendment inserted “child care” following “license-exempt” in (1); substituted “Division of Child Care and Early Childhood Education of the Department of Human Services” for “state child care licensing agency” in (2); and inserted “all licensed child care facilities and all known license-exempt” in (3).

The 2019 amendment substituted “Division of Emergency Management” for “Arkansas Department of Emergency Management” in the introductory language.

Cross References. Arkansas Emergency Services Act of 1973, §12-75-101 et seq.

Interstate Civil Defense and Disaster Compact, §12-76-101 et seq.

History.

Acts 2007, No. 816, § 4; 2009, No. 165, § 61; 2019, No. 910, §
5918.

Subchapter 2

— Emergency Preparedness for Child Care Facilities Act